Idaho, session 2025, H0344.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 46-1008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
46-1008. THE GOVERNOR AND DISASTER EMERGENCIES. (1) Under this act,
the governor may issue executive orders and proclamations and may amend or
rescind them. Executive orders and proclamations have the force and effect
of law; provided, however, that any such orders, proclamations, or rules
must be essential to protect life or property from the occurrence or immi-
nent threat of the state of disaster emergency threatening the safety of per-
sons or property within the state and must be narrowly tailored to effec-
tively protect life or property without placing unnecessary restrictions on
the ability for a person or persons, regardless of job type or classifica-
tion, to work, provide for their families, or otherwise contribute to the
economy of the state of Idaho.
(2) A If the governor has exercised his authority to convene a special
session of the legislature by proclamation under section 9, article IV of
the constitution of the state of Idaho, then he may also declare a disaster
emergency shall be declared by executive order or proclamation of the gover-
nor if he finds a disaster has occurred or that the occurrence or the threat
thereof is imminent. The governor may declare a disaster emergency only if
the stated purpose for convening the special session includes the matter
of the disaster emergency. The state of disaster emergency shall continue
until the governor finds that the threat or danger has passed or the disaster
has been dealt with to the extent that emergency conditions no longer exist,
and when either or both of these events occur, the governor shall terminate
the state of disaster emergency by executive order or proclamation; pro-
vided, however, that no state of disaster emergency may continue for longer
than thirty (30) days unless the governor finds that it should be continued
for another thirty (30) days or any part thereof. The governor shall not
continue the state of disaster emergency beyond sixty (60) days from the date
the disaster emergency was declared. The legislature by concurrent reso-
lution may terminate a state of disaster emergency at any time. Thereupon,
the governor shall issue an executive order or proclamation ending the state
of disaster emergency. All executive orders or proclamations issued under
this subsection shall indicate the nature of the disaster, the area or areas
threatened, the area subject to the proclamation, and the conditions caus-
ing the disaster. An executive order or proclamation shall be disseminated


promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the
general public and, unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster
prevent or impede, be promptly filed with the Idaho office of emergency man-
agement, the office of the secretary of state, and the office of the recorder
of each county where the state of disaster emergency applies.
(3) An executive order or proclamation of a state of disaster emergency
shall activate the disaster response and recovery aspects of the state, lo-
cal, and intergovernmental disaster emergency plans applicable to the po-
litical subdivision or area in question and be authority for the deployment
and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for use or dis-
tribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assem-
bled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this act or
any other provision of law relating to disaster emergencies.
(4) During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency, the
governor is commander-in-chief of the militia and may assume command of all
other forces available for emergency duty. To the greatest extent prac-
ticable, the governor shall delegate or assign command authority by prior
arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or rules, but nothing
herein restricts his authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the
disaster emergency.
(5) In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law,
he may:
(a) Suspend the provisions of any rules prescribing the procedures for
conduct of public business that would in any way prevent, hinder, or de-
lay necessary action in coping with the emergency;
(b) Utilize all resources of the state, including, but not limited to,
those sums in the disaster emergency account as he shall deem necessary
to pay obligations and expenses incurred during a declared state of dis-
aster emergency;
(c) Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state depart-
ments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or fa-
cilitating emergency services;
(d) Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under sec-
tion 46-1012, Idaho Code, and except as provided in subsection (7)(c) of
this section, commandeer or utilize any private property, real or per-
sonal, if he finds this necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;
(e) Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population
from any stricken or threatened area within the state if he deems this
action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitiga-
tion, response, or recovery;
(f) Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in
connection with evacuation;
(g) Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement
of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;
(h) Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing or transportation of alco-
holic beverages, explosives, and combustibles; and
(i) Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency
housing.


(6) Whenever an emergency or a disaster has been declared to exist in
Idaho by the president under the provisions of the disaster relief act of
1974 (P.L. 93-288, 42 U.S.C. 5121), as amended, the governor may:
(a) Enter into agreements with the federal government for the sharing
of disaster recovery expenses involving public facilities;
(b) Require as a condition of state assistance that a local taxing dis-
trict be responsible for paying forty percent (40%) of the nonfederal
share of costs incurred by the local taxing district that have been de-
termined to be eligible for reimbursement by the federal government,
provided that the total local share of eligible costs for a taxing dis-
trict shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the taxing district's tax
charges authorized by section 63-802, Idaho Code;
(c) Obligate the state to pay the balance of the nonfederal share of el-
igible costs within local taxing entities qualifying for federal assis-
tance; and
(d) Enter into agreements with the federal government for the sharing
of disaster assistance expenses to include individual and family grant
programs.
(7) During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency, neither
the governor nor any agency of any governmental entity or political subdivi-
sion of the state shall:
(a) Impose or enforce any additional restrictions on the lawful man-
ufacturing, possession, transfer, sale, transport, storage, display
or use of firearms or ammunition or their components or accessories, or
otherwise limit or suspend any rights guaranteed by the United States
constitution or the constitution of the state of Idaho, including but
not limited to the right to peaceable assembly or free exercise of re-
ligion. The transport, storage, transfer, sale, commerce in, import
and export of, distribution, repair, maintenance, and manufacture of
firearms, ammunition, and related accessories and components, shooting
ranges, and other goods and services directly related to lawful firearm
possession, use, storage, repair, maintenance, sale or transfer, and
training in the use of firearms are declared to be life-sustaining,
essential businesses and services for the purposes of safety and secu-
rity in times of declared emergency or any other statutorily authorized
responses to disaster, war, acts of terrorism, riot or civil disorder,
public health crises, or emergencies of whatever kind or nature;
(b) Suspend or revoke a license to carry concealed weapons or refuse
to accept and process an application for a license to carry concealed
weapons, except in accordance with the provisions of chapter 33, title
18, Idaho Code; or
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5) of this section,
seize, commandeer, or confiscate in any manner any privately owned
firearm, ammunition, or firearms or ammunition components that are pos-
sessed, carried, displayed, sold, transferred, transported, stored, or
used in connection with otherwise lawful conduct.
(8) During any state of disaster emergency, the governor may not alter,
adjust, or create any provision of the Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.